New Jersey, session 222, A3805.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The chair of the Senate Budget and Appropriations Committee and the chair of the Assembly Budget Committee shall, during their respective committee deliberations on the subject of the Governors budget recommendations transmitted to the Legislature for the ensuing State fiscal year, pursuant to section 11 of P.L.1944, c.112 (C.52:27B-20), accept budget resolutions made by any member of the Senate or General Assembly, and the State Treasurer, that propose to add, delete, or otherwise change revenues, line-items or language provisions in the Governors budget recommendations.  Budget resolutions shall be filed with either committee, in a form and manner determined by the President of the Senate and Speaker of the General Assembly, and shall be identified by the sponsor or sponsors of the resolution.  All resolutions to be filed with either committee shall be delivered to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer in the Office of Legislative Services. The sponsor or sponsors of a budget resolution shall set forth in detail therein each revenue, line-item, or language provision proposed to be added, deleted, or changed and append thereto a statement explaining the proposed changes and the reasons therefor.  The sponsor or sponsors of a budget resolution shall append thereto a personal disclosure statement indicating whether the sponsor or the sponsors spouse, domestic partner or civil union partner, children, parents, or siblings, have any employment relationship or business relationship with, or receive any compensation from, the intended recipient of any increased funding proposed in a budget resolution. The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the General Assembly shall establish a schedule for the submission of budget resolutions to the Senate Budget and Appropriations Committee and the Assembly Budget Committee, which schedule shall allow for budget resolutions to be filed and made available to the public on the Legislatures Internet website through the Office of Legislative Services not later than June 1 of each year.  No budget resolution shall be filed with either committee and no budget resolution shall be delivered to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer after June 1 of each year.  An annual appropriations bill that shall pass both Houses of the Legislature shall contain only items proposed in the Governors budget recommendations and additions, deletions, or changes in the budget resolutions filed and made public pursuant to this act. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.